Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-6] Metropolitan planning
organization policy boards; membership and meetings. (a) Policy board
membership shall be established by comprehensive agreement, including any
applicable supplemental agreements and bylaws.

(b) As appropriate, any agreement or committee
bylaws that establish policy board membership may also include specifications
regarding ex officio membership, terms and term limits of members, member
alternates, quorum, and other considerations as permitted by law. [L 2015, c
132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next